Arkansas, session 2025, HB1908.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Proof of Residency for
Public Assistance Act".

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 76, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-76-120. Proof of residency requirement.
For an adult applicant for public assistance who claims to reside in
this state, the state agency or political subdivision administering the
public assistance shall make every reasonable effort to verify the adult
applicant's residency, including without limitation requesting the adult
applicant present one (1) of the following:
(1) A utility bill in the adult applicant's name from at least
*CRH307*
03/24/2025 9:21:32 AM CRH307

HB1908
six (6) months before the application;
(2) A bank statement in the adult applicant's name from at least
six (6) months before the application;
(3) An Arkansas driver's license issued in the six (6) months
before the application; or
(4) A state-issued identification card issued in the six (6)
months before the application.





























03/24/2025 9:21:32 AM CRH307